Mississippi, session 2026, HB1242.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1. This act shall be known and may be cited as the "Mississippi Dyslexia Generative Artificial Intelligence Education and Workforce Development Act". SECTION 2. The Legislature finds that: (a)  Dyslexia affects a significant portion of Mississippi's population and contributes to academic failure, workforce underparticipation, and incarceration; (b)  Mississippi has made substantial investments in dyslexia screening and intervention, yet access to high-quality, consistent instruction remains uneven across educational and institutional settings; (c)  Evidence-based, structured literacy instruction aligned with Orton-Gillingham principles improves literacy outcomes for children, adults, and incarcerated individuals when delivered with fidelity; (d)  Generative artificial intelligence, when responsibly developed and implemented under qualified professional oversight, may enhance individualized instruction, support educators, and scale evidence-based practices; (e)  Publicly funded educational resources should be broadly accessible, transparent, and protected from exclusive control or commercialization that limits public benefit; and (f)  Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia and the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute possess demonstrated expertise in dyslexia education, research, and innovation within the State of Mississippi. The purpose of this act is to: (a)  Establish a state-funded, open-access dyslexia curriculum and generative artificial intelligence system for use in public educational and institutional settings; (b)  Improve literacy outcomes for students, incarcerated individuals, adult learners, and members of the workforce with dyslexia; (c)  Support Mississippi educators, therapists, and institutions through research-based development and sustainable professional services; and (d)  Reduce long-term public costs associated with illiteracy, unemployment, and recidivism. SECTION 3.  As used in this act, the following terms have the meanings as defined in this section unless the context clearly indicates otherwise: (a)  "Department" means the Mississippi Department of Education. (b)  "Program" means the Mississippi Dyslexia Generative Artificial Intelligence Education and Workforce Development Program. (c)  "Generative artificial intelligence system" means a software system that produces instructional materials, planning supports, or recommendations through trained machine learning models operating under human oversight. (d)  "Open-access" means freely available for use, reproduction, and adaptation for noncommercial educational purposes within Mississippi public educational institutions, without licensing fees or access restrictions. (e)  "Founding development partners" means Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia and the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute. SECTION 4. There is hereby established within the department the Mississippi Dyslexia Generative Artificial Intelligence Education and Workforce Development Program.  The program shall develop, maintain, and deploy an open-access dyslexia curriculum and generative artificial intelligence system to support: (a)  Public schools and school districts; (b)  Correctional education programs operated by or in partnership with the Mississippi Department of Corrections; (c)  Adult literacy and high school equivalency programs; and (d)  Workforce development and employer-based training initiatives. SECTION 5. (1)  (a)  The Legislature recognizes Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia as the originating developer and author of the dyslexia curriculum and related instructional materials developed pursuant to this act, in collaboration with the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute as a founding development partner. (b)  Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia shall retain all right, title, and interest in and to the curriculum, instructional materials, methodologies, assessments, and derivative works developed pursuant to this act, including all associated intellectual property rights. (c)  The State of Mississippi shall receive a perpetual, nonexclusive, royalty-free license to use, reproduce, adapt, and distribute the curriculum and related materials for noncommercial educational purposes within Mississippi public schools, public charter schools, public institutions of higher education, and state-operated correctional education programs. (d)  The curriculum and related materials shall be made available for statewide use as open-access educational resources, provided that all uses, adaptations, and derivative works retain clear and continuous attribution to Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia and the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute as the originating and founding development partners. (e)  Attribution to Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia and the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute shall not be removed, altered, or obscured, nor shall the curriculum or any derivative work be represented as having been authored by the State of Mississippi. (f)  Nothing in this act shall prohibit Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia from revising, expanding, licensing, or otherwise using the curriculum or related materials outside the scope of the state's licensed use, nor shall it prohibit the state from entering into future agreements with the founding development partners for updates, professional development, implementation support, research, or related services. (2)  (a)  The dyslexia curriculum developed and maintained pursuant to this act shall be deemed a Mississippi-approved dyslexia curriculum for purposes of implementation within public schools and other educational settings. (b)  The department shall recognize the curriculum developed under this act as meeting the requirements for evidence-based dyslexia instruction referenced in Title 37, Chapter 173, Mississippi Code of 1972, including use by approved dyslexia therapy providers and participants in the Dyslexia Therapy Scholarship Program, where applicable. (c)  Nothing in this act shall be construed to limit the use of other dyslexia curricula, programs, or instructional approaches approved pursuant to Title 37, Chapter 173, Mississippi Code of 1972; rather, the curriculum developed under this act shall serve as an additional, state-supported option aligned with existing dyslexia law. (d)  The department may issue guidance as necessary to ensure alignment between the curriculum developed pursuant to this act and dyslexia screening, intervention, and therapy requirements established under Title 37, Chapter 173, Mississippi Code of 1972. SECTION 6. Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia and the Mississippi Dyslexia Institute are hereby designated as the founding development partners for the program.  The department shall enter into multiyear contracts with the founding development partners for: (a)  Curriculum development and validation; (b)  Generative artificial intelligence training data curation; (c)  Research design and evaluation; (d)  Professional development and implementation support; and (e)  Ongoing system improvement and innovation. SECTION 7. The department shall implement pilot programs for a minimum of six (6) months and a maximum of ten (10) months in each of the following settings: (a)  At least three (3) public school districts; (b)  At least two (2) correctional education facilities; and (c)  At least two (2) adult or workforce education programs. Pilot implementation shall include data collection, educator support, and continuous improvement. SECTION 8. The program shall include a formal research and evaluation component.  The department shall submit annual reports to the Legislature detailing program outcomes, cost efficiencies, and recommendations for statewide expansion. SECTION 9. The department may establish an advisory council composed of representatives from: (a)  Lighthouse Academy for Dyslexia; (b)  Mississippi Dyslexia Institute; (c)  The department; (d)  Mississippi Department of Corrections; (e)  Workforce development agencies; and (f)  Parents and individuals with dyslexia. SECTION 10. The department may promulgate such rules and regulations as are necessary to implement the provisions of this act. SECTION 11.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.